Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-712
Public school;
health education; requirements.

Provisions shall
be made by the proper local school authorities for instructing the pupils
in all public schools in a comprehensive health education program which shall
include instruction (1) as to the physiological, psychological, and sociological
aspects of drug use, misuse, and abuse and (2) on intellectual disability and other developmental
disabilities, such as cerebral palsy, autism, and epilepsy, their causes,
and the prevention thereof through proper nutrition and the avoidance of the
consumption of drugs as defined in this section. For purposes of this section,
drugs means any and all biologically active substances used in the treatment
of illnesses or for recreation or pleasure. Special emphasis shall be placed
upon the commonly abused drugs of tobacco, alcohol, marijuana, hallucinogenics,
amphetamines, barbiturates, and narcotics.

Laws 1885, c. 83, § 1, p. 332;

R.S.1913, § 6878;

C.S.1922, § 6446;

C.S.1929, § 79-1409;

R.S.1943, § 79-1408;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 370, p. 815;

Laws 1971, LB 51, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 423, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-1270;

Laws 1989, LB 15, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140.17;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 386;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 44.
September 6, 2013
School-based health clinics, funding restrictions, see section 71-7606.